Colorado, session 2026A, HB1334.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Increasing wildfire risk in Colorado prompted the passage of
Senate Bill 23-166, which created the Colorado wildfire resiliency code
board within the department of public safety and charged the code board
with establishing a minimum code and standards for hardening structures
and reducing fire risk in the defensible space surrounding structures in the
wildland-urban interface. Senate Bill 23-166 also included a requirement
that local governments adopt the minimum code on or before April 1,
2026.
(b) More meaningful and ongoing public transparency and
engagement are needed to:
(I) Benefit the operation of the Colorado wildfire resiliency code
board;
(II) Ensure the success of the Colorado wildfire resiliency code;
(III) Support local governments that have been tasked with
-2- HB26-1334

implementing the Colorado wildfire resiliency code; and
(IV) Promote a shared understanding and appreciation between all
levels of government, property owners, and builders of the Colorado
wildfire resiliency code.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly further finds and declares that
it is necessary to:
(a) Extend the timeline of the code adoption requirement by one
year to ensure the Colorado wildfire resiliency code board has time to
fulfill its duty to provide support and data to local governments, thereby
allowing local governments to complete code review and adoption
processes in a technically sound and locally defensible manner;
(b) Direct the Colorado wildfire resiliency code board to review
the code within the first year to address unintended consequences and to
promote transparency and engagement;
(c) Expand the appeals process to include more impacted parties;
and
(d) Direct the department of public safety to report on the
Colorado wildfire resiliency code board's activities during the
department's annual SMART Act hearing process.
(3) This act affirms Colorado's commitment to mitigating fire risk
and supporting local governments in creating and enforcing
wildfire-resilient communities.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1236,
amend (4)(b), (4)(b)(II)(D), and (4)(b)(IV) as follows:
24-33.5-1236. Wildfire resiliency code board - powers and
duties - rules - cash fund - legislative declaration - definitions.
(4) Powers and duties.
-3- HB26-1334

(b) In furtherance of its mission, the board shall promulgate
ADOPT rules in accordance with article 4 of this title 24 concerning the
adoption of minimum codes and standards for hardening structures and
reducing fire risk in the defensible space surrounding structures in the
wildland-urban interface in Colorado. Notwithstanding section 24-1-105
(1)(c) or any other law to the contrary, the rules promulgated ADOPTED by
the board are not subject to approval or modification by the director or the
executive director. At a minimum, the rules must:
(II) Adopt minimum codes and standards, referred to in this
section as the "codes", that must:
(D) Be initially adopted by the board no later than July 1, 2025,
and INITIALLY REVIEWED BY THE BOARD NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2026,
reviewed by the board AS OFTEN AS THE BOARD DEEMS NECESSARY BUT
NO LESS FREQUENTLY THAN ONCE every three years, and updated or
supplemented as the board determines may be DEEMS necessary;
(IV) Establish the process by which a governing body OR A
PERSON IMPACTED BY THE CODES may petition the board for a
modification to the codes in accordance with section 24-33.5-1237 (3);
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1237,
amend (2)(a); and add (5) as follows:
24-33.5-1237. Application of wildfire resiliency codes -
enforcement - definitions.
(2) (a) An adopting governing body shall, ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1,
2027, adopt a code that meets or exceeds the minimum standards set forth
in the codes. within nine months of the board adopting the codes in
accordance with section 24-33.5-1236 (4)(b)(II)(D)
(5) BEGINNING IN JANUARY 2027, AND IN JANUARY EVERY YEAR
-4- HB26-1334

THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF ITS
PRESENTATION DURING ITS "SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY
SECTION 2-7-203, INFORMATION CONCERNING:
(a) THE PROGRESS OF THE ADOPTION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF
MINIMUM CODES AND STANDARDS FOR HARDENING STRUCTURES AND
REDUCING FIRE RISK IN THE DEFENSIBLE SPACE SURROUNDING
STRUCTURES IN THE WILDLAND-URBAN INTERFACE IN COLORADO;
(b) ANY KNOWN CHALLENGES LOCAL GOVERNMENTS HAVE
EXPERIENCED DURING THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR IN IMPLEMENTING
THE CODES AND STANDARDS; AND
(c) ANY COST IMPACTS TO PROPERTY OWNERS, INCLUDING
INSURANCE PREMIUM INCREASES, RESULTING FROM THE ADOPTION OR
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE CODES AND STANDARDS.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1334